tests/fixtures/turkish_nouns.lexc
! Turkish noun plural lexicon (minimal example)
! Covers basic e-type vowel harmony for the plural suffix -lAr
! A is an archiphoneme resolved by phonological rules (A -> e after front vowels, A -> a after back vowels)

Multichar_Symbols
  +N        ! Noun
  +Pl       ! Plural
  +Sg       ! Singular
  +Nom      ! Nominative (no case suffix)

LEXICON Root
  Noun ;

LEXICON Noun
  ev       NounStem ;    ! house    (front vowel → evler)
  kitap    NounStem ;    ! book     (back vowel  → kitaplar)
  göz      NounStem ;    ! eye      (front vowel → gözler)
  araba    NounStem ;    ! car      (back vowel  → arabalar)
  fil      NounStem ;    ! elephant (front vowel → filler)
  köy      NounStem ;    ! village  (front vowel → köyler)
  odun     NounStem ;    ! wood     (back vowel  → odunlar)
  ırk      NounStem ;    ! race     (back vowel  → ırklar)
  göğüs    NounStem ;    ! chest    (front vowel → göğüsler)

LEXICON NounStem
  +N:0     Number ;      ! tag as noun, epsilon on surface

LEXICON Number
  +Sg:0    Case ;        ! singular = no suffix
  +Pl:lAr  Case ;        ! plural = lAr (A resolved by phonology)

LEXICON Case
  +Nom:0   # ;           ! nominative = no suffix, end of word
